Washington statutes.
RCW 15.19.080

Public disclosure of information—Exemption.

The department shall not disclose information obtained under this chapter regarding the purchases, sales, or production of an individual American ginseng grower or dealer, except for providing reports to the United States fish and wildlife service. This information is exempt from public disclosure required by chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2005 c 274 s 211; 1998 c 154 s 28.]